Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.370

Nursing technicians—Registration renewal.

The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of the registration. Failure to renew invalidates the registration and all privileges granted by the registration. For renewal of registration, a nursing technician must attest that he or she continues to qualify as a nursing technician as described in RCW 18.79.340.

[ 2003 c 258 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2003 c 258: See notes following RCW 18.79.330.